Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 178.380, as amended by section 1b, chapter 33, Oregon  Laws 2016, is amended
to read:
178.380. (1) The Oregon 529 Savings Board shall establish by rule and maintain a qualified ABLE
program in accordance with the requirements of the ABLE Act.
(2) The rules must:
(a) Allow a person to make contributions for a taxable year to an ABLE  account established for
the purpose of meeting the qualified disability expenses of the  designated beneficiary of the account;
(b) Limit a designated beneficiary to one ABLE account for purposes of this section;
(c) Require cash-only contributions to ABLE accounts;
(d) Provide for a separate accounting for each designated beneficiary of an ABLE account;
(e) Provide that a designated beneficiary of an ABLE account may not, directly or  indirectly,
direct the investment of contributions to the account, or earnings on the account, more than two
times in any calendar year;
(f) Prohibit the use of a designated beneficiary’s interest in an ABLE account  as security for a
loan;
(g) Establish limitations on aggregate contributions to an ABLE account on  behalf of a desig-
nated beneficiary; and
(h) Satisfy all other requirements of section 529A of the  Internal Revenue Code, the ABLE Act,
rules adopted by the United States Secretary of the Treasury under the ABLE Act and  other ap-
plicable federal law.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law that requires  consideration of one or more fi-
nancial circumstances of an individual for the purpose  of determining the eligibility to receive, or
the amount of, any assistance or benefit authorized by law to be  provided to or for the benefit of
the individual, any amount in an  ABLE account of the individual, including earnings on the account,
any contributions to the ABLE account of the individual and any distribution for  qualified disability
expenses, shall be disregarded  for such purpose with respect to any period during which the indi-
vidual maintains, makes contributions to or receives distributions from the ABLE account.
(4)(a) Except as provided by federal law, upon the death of  a designated beneficiary,
amounts in an ABLE account may be transferred to  the estate of the designated beneficiary
Enrolled Senate Bill 1027 (SB 1027-A) Page 1
or an ABLE account of  another eligible individual specified by the designated beneficiary or
the estate of the designated beneficiary.
(b) Except as required by federal law, the  Department of Human Services and the Oregon
Health Authority may not seek payment under ORS 416.350 or section 529A(f) of  the Internal
Revenue Code from amounts in an ABLE account or from amounts transferred  from an
ABLE account under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) Except as permitted in section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code, no
person other than the Oregon 529 Savings Board or a  financial institution in which Oregon
529 Savings Network moneys have been invested has the  right to direct the investment of
amounts held by the network in trust, or any earnings from those amounts.
(b) Nothing in  this subsection prohibits a designated beneficiary from directing the in-
vestment of contributions to the network or earnings  from those contributions by selecting
between investment options offered under the network in accordance with rules adopted by
the board.
(2)(a) The network, the board, a board member and the  State of Oregon may not insure
any account or guarantee any rate of return or any interest rate on any contribution.
(b) The network, the board, a board member and the State of  Oregon are not liable for
any loss incurred by any person as a result of participating in the network.
(3) The board, in its sole discretion and without liability, may remove the network’s funds
from any financial institution and reinvest the funds in a similar or different investment
alternative at another financial institution pursuant to a contract,  agreement or arrange-
ment entered into under ORS 178.315 (4).
(4) This section applies only to ABLE accounts.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 178.375, as amended by section 1a, chapter 33, Oregon  Laws 2016, is amended
to read:
178.375. As used in this section and ORS 178.380  and section 2 of this 2017 Act :
(1) “ABLE account” means an account established by an eligible  individual, owned by the eli-
gible individual  and maintained under the qualified ABLE program established by the Oregon 529
Savings Board under ORS 178.380.
(2) “ABLE Act” means the Stephen  Beck, Jr., Achieving a Better Life Experience Act of 2014
(Division B of P.L. 113-295).
(3) “Designated beneficiary” has the same meaning as contained  in section 529A of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(4) “Eligible individual” has the same meaning as contained in section 529A of the Internal  Re-
venue Code.
(5) “Internal Revenue Code” means the federal  Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect
on December 31, 2015.
(6) “Qualified disability expense” has the same meaning as contained in section  529A of the
Internal Revenue Code.
SECTION 4.  ORS 178.340 is amended to read:
178.340. (1)(a) Except as permitted in section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, no person  other
than the Oregon 529 Savings Board or  a financial institution in which Oregon 529 Savings Network
funds have been invested [ shall have ] has  the right to direct the investment of  [any contributions to
or earnings from the network ] amounts held by the network in trust, or  any earnings from
those amounts.
(b) Nothing in this subsection prohibits a designated beneficiary from directing  the in-
vestment of contributions to the network  or earnings from those contributions by selecting
between investment options offered under the network in accordance with rules adopted by
the board.
(2) The network, the board, [ each] a board member and the State  of Oregon may not insure any
account or guarantee any rate of return or any interest rate on  any contribution. The network, the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1027 (SB 1027-A) Page 2
board, [ each] a board member and the State  of Oregon may not be liable for any loss incurred by
any person as a result of participating in the network.
(3) The board,  in the exercise of its sole discretion and without liability, may remove the
network’s  funds  from any financial institution and reinvest the funds in a similar or different in-
vestment alternative at another financial institution pursuant to a contract,  agreement or arrange-
ment entered into under ORS 178.315 (4).
(4) This section applies only to accounts established for qualified higher education expenses.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 416.350 is amended to read:
416.350. (1) The Department of Human Services  or the Oregon Health Authority may recover
from any  person the amounts of medical assistance the department or the authority incorrectly paid
to or on behalf of the person.
(2) Except as prohibited by ORS 178.380,  medical assistance  pursuant to ORS chapter 414 paid
to or on behalf  of an individual who was 55 years of age or older when the individual received the
assistance, or paid to or on  behalf of a person of any age who was a permanently institutionalized
inpatient in a nursing facility, intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities or
other medical institution, may be recovered from the estate  of the individual or from any recipient
of property or other assets held by the  individual at the time of death including the estate of the
surviving spouse. Claim  for such medical assistance correctly paid to or on behalf of the individual
may be established  against the estate, but the claim may not be adjusted or recovered until after
the death  of the surviving spouse, if any, and only at a time when the individual has no surviving
child who is under 21 years of age or  who is blind or permanently and totally disabled. Transfers
of real or  personal property by recipients of such aid without adequate consideration are voidable
and may be set aside under ORS 411.620 (2).
(3) Nothing in this section authorizes the recovery of the amount of any aid  from the estate or
surviving spouse of a recipient to the extent that the need for aid resulted from a crime committed
against the recipient.
(4) In any action or proceeding under this section to recover medical assistance paid, it is  the
legal burden of the person who receives the  property or other assets from a medical assistance re-
cipient to establish the extent and value of the recipient’s  legal title or interest in the property or
assets in accordance with rules established by the authority.
(5) Amounts recovered under this section do not include the value of benefits paid  to or on be-
half of a beneficiary under a policy or certificate  of qualified long term care insurance as defined
in ORS 743.652, that were disregarded  in determining eligibility for or the amount of medical as-
sistance provided to the beneficiary.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) “Estate” includes all real and personal property and other  assets in which the deceased in-
dividual had any legal title or interest at  the time of death including assets conveyed to a survivor,
heir or assign of the deceased individual through joint tenancy, tenancy in common, survivorship,
life estate, living trust or other similar arrangement.
(b) “Medical assistance”  includes the state’s monthly contribution to the federal government to
defray the costs of outpatient prescription drug coverage provided to a person who is eligible for
Medicare Part D prescription drug coverage and who receives medical assistance.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 178.315 is amended to read:
178.315. The Oregon 529 Savings Board shall have the following powers, duties, and functions:
(1) To establish, develop, implement and  maintain the Oregon 529 Savings Network in a manner
consistent with ORS 178.300 to 178.355, 178.375 and 178.380 and sections 529 and 529A of the
Internal Revenue Code and to obtain the benefits of sections 529 and 529A of the Internal  Revenue
Code for the network and its participants.
(2) To adopt  rules for the general administration of the network, to administer ORS 178.300 to
178.355, 178.375 and 178.380 and to ensure  the network’s compliance with sections 529 and 529A of
the Internal Revenue Code.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1027 (SB 1027-A) Page 3
(3) To maintain, invest and reinvest the funds contributed into the network  consistent with the
investment restrictions established by the board. The investment  restrictions shall be consistent
with the objectives of the network, and the board shall exercise the judgment and  care then pre-
vailing that persons of prudence, discretion and intelligence exercise in the management of their
own affairs with due regard to the probable  income and level of risk from certain types of invest-
ments of money, in accordance with the policies established by the board.
(4) To make and enter  into any and all contracts, agreements or arrangements, and to retain,
employ and contract for the services of private  and public financial institutions, depositories, con-
sultants, investment advisors or managers and third-party plan  administrators and for research,
technical and other services necessary or desirable for carrying  out the purposes of ORS 178.300 to
178.355, 178.375 and 178.380.
(5) To accept donations or receive funds for  the purpose of providing scholarships, grants and
other incentives to account owners,  potential account owners and their designated beneficiaries or
furthering any of the purposes of ORS 178.300 to 178.355, 178.375 and 178.380.
(6) To encourage increased participation in the network by  awarding scholarships or grants,
providing or making available other incentives to  account owners or potential account owners and
their designated beneficiaries,  or entering into promotional arrangements with third parties as the
board deems desirable.
(7) To adopt rules to establish a qualified ABLE program under ORS  178.380 and to administer
and maintain the program in a manner  consistent with ORS 178.375 and 178.380 and the ABLE Act.
(8) To enter into agreements with other states to provide services to the other states
related to the other states’ ABLE programs.
SECTION 7.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate April 18, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1027 (SB 1027-A) Page 4